test/src/morphology/V-pesta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pestä: # Verb 'to wash / pestä' - full paradigm
     pestä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: pezen
     pestä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: pezet
     pestä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: pezöy
     pestä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: pezemmö
     pestä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: pezettö
     pestä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: pestäh
     pestä+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peze

     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: pezin
     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: pezit
     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: pezi
     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: pezimmö
     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: pezittö
     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: pestih
     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pessyh
     pestä+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: pesty

     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: pezizin
     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: pezizit
     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3: pezis
     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1: pezizimmö
     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: pezizittö
     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: pestäs
     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pezis
     pestä+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3: pestäs

     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1: pessyzin
     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2: pessyzit
     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3: pessys
     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1: pessyzimmö
     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2: pessyzittö
     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3: pestännys
     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: pessys
     pestä+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: pestännys

     pestä+V+Pot+ScSg1: pessen
     pestä+V+Pot+ScSg2: pesset
     pestä+V+Pot+ScSg3: pessöy
     pestä+V+Pot+ScPl1: pessemmö
     pestä+V+Pot+ScPl2: pessettö
     pestä+V+Pot+ScPl3: pestänneh
     pestä+V+Pot+ConNeg: pesse
     pestä+V+Pot+ConNeg+ScPl3: pestänne

     pestä+V+Imprt+ScSg2: peze
     pestä+V+Imprt+ScSg3: peskäh
     pestä+V+Imprt+ScPl1: peskiämmö
     pestä+V+Imprt+ScPl2: [peskiä, peskiättö]
     pestä+V+Imprt+ScPl3: pestähes
     pestä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg2: peze
     pestä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg3: peskäh
     pestä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl1: peskiämmö
     pestä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl2: peskiä
     pestä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl3: pestähes

     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc: pessyh
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc: pestävy
     pestä+V+PssPrfPrc: pesty
     pestä+V+Inf: pestä

     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pezii
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pezijän
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [pezii, pezijän]
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Par: pezijiä
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ess: pezijänny
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Tra: pezijäkse
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ine: pezijäs
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [pezijäspäi, pezijäs]
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pezijäh
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ade: pezijäl
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [pezijälpäi, pezijäl]
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+All: pezijäle
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Abe: [pezijättäh, pezijätä, pezijättä]
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Com: pezijänke
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Prl: pezijäči
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pezijät
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: pezijöin
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Acc: pezijät
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Par: pezijöi
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ess: pezijöinny
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Tra: pezijöikse
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ine: pezijöis
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [pezijöispäi, pezijöis]
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: pezijöih
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ade: pezijöil
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [pezijöilpäi, pezijöil]
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+All: pezijöile
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Abe: [pezijöittäh, pezijöitä, pezijöittä]
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Com: pezijöinke
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Prl: pezijöiči
     pestä+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ins: pezijöin

     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pestävy
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pestävän
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [pestävy, pestävän]
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Par: pestäviä
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ess: pestävänny
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Tra: pestäväkse
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ine: pestäväs
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [pestäväspäi, pestäväs]
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pestäväh
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ade: pestäväl
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [pestävälpäi, pestäväl]
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+All: pestäväle
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Abe: [pestävättäh, pestävätä, pestävättä]
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Com: pestävänke
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Prl: pestäväči

     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pestävät
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: pestävien
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Acc: pestävät
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Par: pestävii
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ess: pestävinny
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Tra: pestävikse
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ine: pestävis
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [pestävispäi, pestävis]
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: pestävih
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ade: pestävil
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [pestävilpäi, pestävil]
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+All: pestävile
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Abe: [pestävittäh, pestävitä, pestävittä]
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Com: pestävienke
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Prl: pestäviči
     pestä+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ins: pestävin

     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pessyh
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Gen: pessyön
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Acc: [pessyh, pessyön]
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Par: pessytty
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ess: pessyönny
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Tra: pessyökse
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ine: pessyös
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ela: [pessyöspäi, pessyös]
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ill: pessyöh
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Ade: pessyöl
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Abl: [pessyölpäi, pessyöl]
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+All: pessyöle
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Abe: [pessyöttäh, pessyötä, pessyöttä]
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Com: pessyönke
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Sg+Prl: pessyöči

     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pessyöt
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Gen: pessyzien
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Acc: pessyöt
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Par: pessyzii
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ess: pessyzinny
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Tra: pessyzikse
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ine: pessyzis
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ela: [pessyzispäi, pessyzis]
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ill: pessyzih
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Ade: pessyzil
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Abl: [pessyzilpäi, pessyzil]
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+All: pessyzile
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Abe: [pessyzittäh, pessyzitä, pessyzittä]
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Com: pessyzienke
     pestä+V+ActPrfPrc+Pl+Prl: pessyziči
